Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0285

"Thing of value."

"Thing of value," as used in this chapter, means any money or property, any token, object or article exchangeable for money or property, or any form of credit or promise, directly or indirectly, contemplating transfer of money or property or of any interest therein, or involving extension of a service, entertainment or a privilege of playing at a game or scheme without charge.

[ 1987 c 4 s 22. Formerly RCW 9.46.020(21).]